Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.068

Application for registration—When registered—Incomplete application—Failure to pay filing fee.

(1) Entities are deemed registered under RCW 19.09.075 or 19.09.079 twenty days after receipt of the registration or renewal form by the secretary and may thereafter solicit contributions from the general public.

(2) If the secretary determines that the application for initial registration or renewal is incomplete, the secretary will notify the applicant of the information necessary to complete the application. The secretary may hold the application up to thirty days to allow the applicant time to provide additional information. If the applicant fails to provide complete information as requested by the secretary, the applicant will be deemed unregistered and must cease all solicitations as defined by this chapter.

(3) If an applicant fails to pay a required fee for any filing, the secretary will notify the applicant of the necessary fee to complete the application. The secretary may hold the application up to thirty days to allow the applicant time to submit the required payment. If the applicant fails to provide the required payment as requested by the secretary, the applicant will be deemed unregistered and must cease all solicitations as defined by this chapter.

[ 2011 c 199 s 6.]